Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1246
Taxation of air carriers; real and personal property other than flight equipment.

Real property and personal property, except flight equipment, of an air carrier shall be taxed in the political subdivisions of the state in accordance with the applicable laws of this state.

Laws 1947, c. 266, § 3, p. 860;

Laws 1965, c. 478, § 10, p. 1544.